Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.166

Subpoenas—Court approval—Process.

(1) In addition to the authority granted in RCW 43.09.165, the state auditor and his or her authorized assistants may apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county. The application must (a) state that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection; (b) adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and (c) declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the state auditor's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the state auditor's authority.

(2) Where the application under this section is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this section constitutes authority of law for the state auditor to subpoena the records or testimony.

(3) The state auditor and his or her authorized assistants may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.

[ 2013 c 50 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2013 c 50: "The legislature intends to provide a process for the state auditor's office to apply for court approval of an investigative subpoena which is authorized under current law in cases where the agency seeks such approval, or where court approval is required by Article I, section 7 of the state Constitution. The legislature does not intend to require court approval except where otherwise required by law or Article I, section 7 of the state Constitution. The legislature does not intend to create any new authority to subpoena records or create any new rights for any person." [ 2013 c 50 s 1.]